Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 4931.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agricultural activity” includes the growing, raising, and production of horticultural and silvicultural crops, grapes, berries, trees, fruit, poultry, livestock, grain, hay, and dairy products.

“Dwelling house” means a residential structure or mobile home which contains one to four family housing units, or individual units of condominiums or cooperatives, other than a time-share in a unit, each of which is used or intended to be used as a residence. For the purposes of this subdivision, “time-share” means a time-share estate as defined by

32 V.S.A. § 3619(a)

.

“Farmland” means land devoted primarily to commercial agricultural activities.

“Value” means market value less all reasonable expenses that would be incurred in selling the property. Market value for purposes of this section may be determined based on evidence of market value deemed by the court to be reasonably reliable, which may include grand list valuation and the common level of appraisal used in the town where the property is located, if the court finds such evidence to be reasonably reliable.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2013, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 4932.
Venue; joinder of parties; recording.

Actions to foreclose a mortgage under subchapter 2 or 3 of this chapter shall be brought in the Civil Division of the Superior Court for the county where the land lies, or, if the land described in the mortgage lies in more than one county, then in one of the counties in which the land lies.

The plaintiff shall file a copy of the complaint in the town clerk’s office in each town where the mortgaged property is located. The clerk of the town shall minute on the margin of the record of the mortgage that a copy of foreclosure proceedings on the mortgage is filed. The filing shall be sufficient notice of the pendency of the action to all persons who acquire any interest or lien on the mortgaged premises between the dates of filing the copy of foreclosure and the recording of the final judgment in the proceedings. Without further notice or service, those persons shall be bound by the judgment entered in the cause and be foreclosed from all rights or equity in the premises as completely as though they had been parties in the original action.

If the mortgaged property is subject to a residential rental agreement, as defined in

9 V.S.A. § 4451

:

The plaintiff shall join as a party defendant any person occupying the mortgaged property pursuant to a residential rental agreement as of the date the copy of the complaint is recorded in the land records. Service of the complaint on the tenant shall be sufficient if mailed to the tenant by first class mail at the address specified in the rental agreement, if the agreement is recorded, or to the “occupant” at the address of the leased premises if the agreement is not recorded.

The summons and complaint served on any person occupying the premises pursuant to a residential rental agreement shall contain the following notice, written in at least 14-point type:

THE PROPERTY IN WHICH YOU LIVE IS BEING FORECLOSED UPON. YOU ARE NAMED AS A DEFENDANT IN THE FORECLOSURE BECAUSE YOUR RIGHT TO REMAIN ON THE PREMISES MAY END WHEN THE FORECLOSURE IS COMPLETED. YOU MUST NOTIFY THE COURT OF YOUR NAME AND ADDRESS IN ORDER TO BE KEPT INFORMED OF THE STATUS OF THE FORECLOSURE.

Upon receipt of the complaint, the owner of the mortgaged property shall notify each tenant who enters into a residential rental agreement that the premises are the subject of a pending foreclosure action and that, in the event the owner is unable to redeem the premises, the tenant may be required to vacate the premises upon 30 days’ notice, or upon such other notice as is required by federal law, whichever is longer. The failure of the owner to provide notice under this subsection shall not affect or invalidate the foreclosure action.

All proceedings shall be before the Superior judge alone, and trial shall be without jury.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4933.
Repealed. 2019, No. 20, § 105.

§ 4934.
Supplemental judgment joining parties; recording.

At any time, without further notice or service on the purchaser or mortgagor or lienholder whose interest in the property being foreclosed first arose after the filing of the complaint in the town clerk’s office, and upon filing certified copies of the deed, mortgage, or attachment with the clerk of the court by the plaintiff in the foreclosure action, any Superior judge may sign a supplemental judgment specifically naming that party. Reference to the deed, mortgage, or lien and the supplemental judgment may be filed in the town clerk’s office for record, and it shall have the same force and effect as though that person had been made a party defendant in the original action.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4935.
Taxes paid by mortgagee.

A tax assessed upon mortgaged real estate in this State may be paid by the mortgagee or assignee of the mortgage upon such property. The amount so paid, including costs, if any, shall thereupon be added to and become a part of the debt or obligation secured by such mortgage.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4936.
Foreclosure of real or personal property.

A mortgage or a security agreement constituting a lien on both real and personal property to secure the payment of a debt, whether evidenced by one or more instruments, may be foreclosed in an action under subchapter 2 or 3 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4937.
Attorney’s fees.

When a mortgage contains an agreement on the part of the mortgagor to pay the mortgagee, in the event of foreclosure, the attorney’s fees incident thereto, and claim is made therefor in the complaint, upon hearing, the court in which the complaint is brought shall allow such fee as in its judgment is just.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4938.
Effect on bankruptcy proceedings.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to supersede any provision of Title 11 of the United States Code.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4939.
Appeals.

When a judgment is for the foreclosure of a mortgage, permission of the court shall be required for review.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.